Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-108
Roads; establishment; abandonment; eminent domain.

The county board shall have power to lay out, alter or discontinue any road running through its county, to vacate or discontinue public roads running parallel and adjacent to state or federal highways not more than four hundred yards from said highway, or any part thereof, or any abandoned or unused road or part thereof, and for such purpose may acquire title to lands therein, either by gift, prescription, dedication, the exercise of the right of eminent domain, purchase or lease, and may perform such duties concerning roads as may be prescribed by law; Provided, that the county board shall not vacate or discontinue any public road or any part thereof which is within the area of the zoning jurisdiction of a city of the metropolitan, primary or first class without the prior approval of the governing body of such city.

Laws 1879, § 23, p. 360;

Laws 1887, c. 26, § 1, p. 351;

Laws 1905, c. 44, § 1, p. 288;

R.S.1913, § 952;

Laws 1915, c. 17, § 1, p. 73;

C.S.1922, § 852;

Laws 1925, c. 93, § 1, p. 274;

Laws 1929, c. 60, § 2, p. 232;

C.S.1929, § 26-105;

Laws 1931, c. 40, § 1, p. 135;

Laws 1933, c. 36, § 1, p. 236;

Laws 1939, c. 28, § 5, § 145;

Laws 1941, c. 48, § 2, p. 236;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-105;

Laws 1943, c. 57, § 1(4), p. 225;

R.S.1943, § 23-108;

Laws 1971, LB 192, § 1.

For acquisition of property by eminent domain for county road purposes, see section 39-1701 et seq.

Dedication of road was not sufficiently shown. Nelson v. Reick, 96 Neb. 486, 148 N.W. 331 (1914).